Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7904
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-7904 to 71-7913 shall be known and may be cited as the Health Care Quality Improvement Act.

Laws 2011, LB431, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB119, § 1.